Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.510

Right-of-way donations—Credit against required improvements.

Where the zoning and planning provisions of a county require landscaping, parking, or other improvements as a condition to granting permits for commercial or industrial developments, the county may credit donations of right-of-way in excess of that required for traffic improvement against such landscaping, parking, or other requirements.

[ 1987 c 267 s 10.]

NOTES:

Right-of-way donations: Chapter 47.14 RCW.